Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201281-3701
Act,
how cited.

Sections 81-3701
to 81-3724 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Visitors
Development Act.

Laws 1980, LB 499, § 19;

Laws 1988, LB 797, § 10;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 81-1263;

Laws 2012, LB1053, § 1.
July 1, 2012